Hawaii statutes.
[§460J-8.5] Requirements to maintain
license. (a) A licensed pest control operator shall have and maintain in
full force and effect the following:

(1) Workers' compensation insurance, unless the
licensee is authorized to act as a self-insurer under chapter 386 or is
excluded from the requirements of chapter 386; and

(2) Liability insurance from an insurance company or
agency for comprehensive personal injury and property damage liability in an
amount prescribed by the board through its rules.

(b) Failure, refusal, or neglect of any
licensed pest control operator to maintain in full force and effect the
required workers' compensation insurance or liability insurance shall cause the
automatic forfeiture of the license of the pest control operator effective as
of the date of expiration or cancellation of the pest control operator's
workers' compensation insurance or liability insurance.

(c) The pest control operator shall
immediately notify the board of termination or cancellation of any insurance
required under the chapter. Failure to notify the board shall subject the
licensee to discipline pursuant to section 460J-15.

(d) The board shall not restore the forfeited
license until satisfactory proof of continuous or replacement insurance
coverage is submitted to the board as required by this section.

(e) Failure to submit proof of continuous or
replacement coverage required by subsection (d) within sixty days after the
date of forfeiture shall result in the forfeiture of all fees and shall require
the person to apply as a new applicant.

(f) A licensee, within sixty days after
receipt of the notification of the forfeiture, may request an administrative
hearing to review the forfeiture pursuant to chapter 91. A request for an
administrative hearing shall not stay or affect the provisions of subsections
(d) and (e). [L 2004, c 175, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next